Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Article 6. Miscellaneous

386.504.
Short title.

KRS

386.450

to

386.504

may be cited as the “Kentucky Principal and Income Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 28, effective January 1, 2005.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Trusts, § 231.00.